Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-687
Contracts; terms; special election.

In case such aids shall not be voted by the people in the manner aforesaid, or having voted bonds and constructed a system of waterworks and having failed to obtain an adequate supply of good water, then the mayor and council may contract with and procure individuals or corporations to construct and maintain a system of waterworks, power, heating or lighting plant in such city for any time not exceeding twenty years from the date of the contract, with a reservation to the city of the right to purchase such waterworks, lighting, heating, or power plant at any time after the lapse of ten years from the date of the contract upon payment to such individuals or corporations of any amount to be determined from the contract, not exceeding the cost of the construction of such waterworks, power, lighting, or heating plant. In other respects such contract may be on such terms as may be agreed upon by a two-thirds vote of the council, entered upon the minutes; Provided, that no such contract shall be made unless authorized by a majority vote of the legal voters of such city at a special election called for that purpose, notice of which shall be given by publication once each week for three successive weeks prior thereto in a legal newspaper published in or of general circulation in such city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 60, p. 276;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 120;

R.S.1913, § 4961;

C.S.1922, § 4130;

C.S.1929, § 16-659;

R.S.1943, § 16-687;

Laws 1951, c. 26, § 4, p. 119.

After having voted bonds and constructed a waterworks system, and having failed to obtain adequate supply of water, city may contract with private company for supplemental water supply. Hevelone v. City of Beatrice, 120 Neb. 648, 234 N.W. 791 (1931).